patterns/hyph.la.classical.ec.txt
te6r5e6rim
te6r5e6rit
te6r5e6rít
te4re4ro
te4r5e4ró
tere4ru
te6r5erun
te4r5e4rú
ter5est
te3rev
te4r5é4me
te6r5é6mi.
te6r5é6mit
te3rén
te6r5é6rim
te6r5é6rit
ter5ést
ter5ibo
ter5ibun
ter5ibún
te4ric
ter5ice
te4rie
ter5ien
ter3ié
te4r5ime
te4rimé
te4r5imo
te4r5imó
te4r3i4r
te6r5iss
te4r5ist
ter5i6ta.
ter5i6tae
ter5i6tam
ter5i6tan
ter5i6taq
ter5i6tar
ter5i6tau
ter5i6tav
ter5i6táe
ter5i6tám
ter5i6tán
ter5i6táq
ter5i6tár
ter5i6táu
ter5i6táv
te4r5itæ
te6r5i6ti.
te6r5i6tin
ter5itio
ter5itió
te6r5i6tiq
te6r5i6tiu
te6r5i6tiv
te6r5i6tín
te6r5i6tíq
te6r5i6tíu
te6r5i6tív
te6r5itorum
te6r5itorú
te6r5i6tos
te6r5itórum
te6r5i6tós
teri4tu
ter5itu.
ter5itum
ter5itun
ter5ituq
ter5itur
ter6itur.
ter6iturn
ter6iturq
ter6iturue
ter6iturv
ter5itus
ter5ituu
ter5ituv
te6r5i6túm
te6r5i6tún
te6r5i6túq
te6r5itúra
te6r5itúræ
te6r5itúre
te6r5itúri
te6r5itúro
ter5itúrum
ter5itúrus
te6r5i6tús
te6r5i6túu
te6r5i6túv
ter3i4u
te5rium
te4r3i4v
ter3íe
te4r5íme
ter5í6mur
te4r3í4r
te4r5íss
te4r5íst
te4r5í4ta
te6r5í6te.
ter5ítio
te4r5í4to
te6r5ítur
ter6íue.
ter5í6uer
te4r5í4ui
ter6íve.
ter5í6ver
te4r5í4vi
te3ro.
te3rop
te3roq
te5rorn
4terot
te3rou
te3rov
te3rón
te4róni
te3róq
4terót
te3róu
te3róv
ter3uí
ter5usu
2t3ess
4test.
te5s4ta.
te5stabam.
te5stabamn
te5stabamq
te5stabamue
te5stabamus
te5stabamús
te5stabamv
te5stabant.
te5stabantn
te5stabantq
te5stabantue
te5stabantv
te5stabas
te5stabat.
te5stabati
te5stabatí
te5stabatn
te5stabatq
te5stabatue
te5stabatv
te5stabámn
te5stabámq
te5stabámue
te5stabámus
te5stabámv
te5stabántn
te5stabántq
te5stabántue
te5stabántv
te5stabás
te5stabáti
te5stabátn
te5stabátq
te5stabátue
te5stabátv
te5stabimus
te5stabimús
te5stabis
te5stabit.
te5stabiti
te5stabití
te5stabitn
te5stabitq
te5stabitue
te5stabitv
te5stabís
te5stabít
te5stabo.
te5stabon
te5staboq
te5stabou
te5stabov
te5stabón
te5stabóq
te5stabóu
te5stabóv
te5stabunt.
te5stabuntn
te5stabuntq
te5stabuntue
te5stabuntv
te5stabúntn
te5stabúntq
te5stabúntue
te5stabúntv
te5stamus
te5stamús
te5stane
te5stant.
te5stantn
te5stanto.
te5stanton
te5stantoq
te5stantou
te5stantov
te5stantón
te5stantóq
te5stantóu
te5stantóv
te5stantq
te5stantue
te5stantv
te5s4taq
te5starem.
te5staremn
te5staremq
te5staremue
te5staremus
te5staremús
te5staremv
te5starent.
te5starentn
te5starentq
te5starentue
te5starentv
te5stares
te5staret.
te5stareti
te5staretí
te5staretn
te5staretq
te5staretue
te5staretv
te5starémn
te5starémq
te5starémue
te5starémus
te5starémv
te5staréntn
te5staréntq
te5staréntue
te5staréntv
te5starés
te5staréti
te5starétn
te5starétq
te5starétue
te5starétv
te5stat.
te5statn
te5statot
te5statót
te5statq
te5statue
te5statv
te5s4tau
te5s4tav
te5stábam
te5stában
te5stábas
te5stábat
te5stábimus
te5stábis
te5stábit.
te5stábiti
te5stábo.
te5stábu
te5stámus
te5stáne
te5stántn
te5stánto.
te5stántq
te5stántue
te5stántv
te5s4táq
te5stárem
te5stárent
te5stáres
te5stáret
te5státn
te5státq
te5státue
te5státv
te5s4táu
te5s4táv
te5stemus
te5stemús
te5stent.
te5stentn
te5stentq
te5stentue
te5stentv
te6ster
te5stet.
te5steti
te5stetí
te5stetn
te5stetq
te5stetue
te5stetv
te5stémus
te5sténtn
te5sténtq
te5sténtue
te5sténtv
te5stéti
te5stétn
te5stétq
te5stétue
te5stétv
tes3ti
4testn
4testq
4t3estu
4testv
tete5r
tete7rit
2teté
4tetim
4tetit
4tetít
te2un
te2us
te2ut
te3x2e
tex2i
texi5tur
tex2í
tex2o
tex2ó
tex2u
tex2ú
té4r3ea
tér5eor
té4r5e4ra
té6r5e6rit
té4re4ro
tér5ien
té4r5im.
tér5i6ta.
tér5i6tae
tér5i6tam
té4r5i4tæ
té6r5i6ti.
té6r5i6tos
té6r5i6tu.
té6r5i6tum
té6r5i6tus
4térnar
4térnat
4térner
4térnes
4térnet
té4rui
2t3éss
5tésta
té5s4ta.
té5stant
té5s4tat
té5stent
té5s4tet
4téti.
4tétim
4tétit
téxi3
téx2u
2tf
2tg
t2h
2th.
3the
the2i
3thé
2thm
2thn
3tho
tho3sp
3thó
2thp
3thu
3thú
t2i
tiad2
ti2á
ti4ám
3tiæ
ti3b
t3ibi.
3tic
tic4e
ti5cen
4tiche
ti4cue
3tid
ti4d3ea
ti4d3eo
2tigi
2till
3tilo
3tiló
ti3m2
ti4mn
ti4mq
ti4mv
tin2u
ti3q
ti2s
ti3s2p
ti4sper
ti3s4ta
tis4tán
tis4tát
ti3s4te
ti3s4té
tis4tít
ti3s4to
ti3s4tó
ti3s4tr
ti3t2
ti4tn
ti4tq
ti4tv
ti3uu
tí3b
3tíc
4tíche
tí4d3ea
tí4d3eo
3tílo
tí1m
4tímul
tín2u
tí3q
2tírp
tí2s
tí3sp
tís4tat
tí3s4te
tí3s4to
tí3s4tr
tís3u
4títib
tí3tui
tí3tur
t2l
t3li
t3lí
2t1m2
2t1n
t3ne
t2o
tob2
to4cue
to5diu
todí5tur
to2ia
to2iá
to2ie
to2ié
to2ii
to2ií
to2io
to2ió
to2í
tom2
tom4e
ton3g4
tongæ3
to3ni
toni5c
tons3t
ton2u
2t3o2pe
tos3t
tó2cu
tó2ia
tó2ii
tó2io
2tólo
tó2pe
2tp
tpo3
2tq
t3qu
t2r2
trab2
tra3d4
trado3
tra3e4t
tra3g
tra3i
3tral
tr4am
tra5ma
tra5má
4trang
trá3i
4tráng
trá3p2
trá2s3
trá5str
3tre.
tre2i
tr4em
tre5mi
tre5mo
tr4en
2trep
3treq
3treu
3trev
2trép
3tria
3trib
tri5ci
4trict
2trid
tri5do
2trig
3trige
3trigé
3trii
3trií
2tr4in
3trio
3trió
3trit
3tría
4tríct
4trída
4trído
4trídu
4trígi
4trígu
4tríng
4trínx
trí5tur
4troph
tr4or
tró3ea
2tróm
4tróph
4truct
3trud
3trus
2trux
4trúct
3trúd
3trús
2trúx
2t1s2
2tt2
tte2i
tte5re
3tua
3tuá
tu2cu
tu2d3u
2t1ue
t3ue.
t2uea
t2ueá
t2ueb
3t2uem
3t2uen
tu3enn
t2ueo
t2ueó
3t2ueq
t2uer
3t2ues
3t2uet
3t2ueu
3tuev
3tué
tu3énn
2t3uic
3tuis
3tuit
3tul
tu3ma
tum2e
3t2uo
3tuó
tupe3r
ture5ia.
ture5iaq
ture5iau
ture5iav
ture5ii
ture5ií
ture5io
ture5ió
turé3
tu2sp
3tut
3tuun
tú2cu
tú2du
túm2i
2tv
t3ve
tý3l
1uac
1ua3d2
uad4o
uae4st
2uaev
ua3g
ual4u
ua1m
u2an
ua3p2
ua3q
uas3p
uas3t
uas5te
uas5tr
ua4sui
ua4suí
u2au
2uav
ua2x3
u2á
1uác
1uád2
uá3p2
uás3p
uá4sui
2uáv
uá2x
2uæd
uæ2dí
uæ2s3t
2uæv
uba3g
uba2i
ubá3g
ube2i
u5bere.
u5bereq
u5bereu
u5berev
ube4rim
ub4eris
u3bére
2ubi
ubi2b
ub3ice
ub4ii.
ub4iin
ub4iiq
ub4iiu
ub4iiv
ub4iín
ub4iíq
ub4iíu
ub4iív
u3bió
ub2iq
ub4iue.
u3b2iú
ub4ive.
2ubí
ubí2b
ubí2c
ub4íne
ub2íq
ub4íue.
ub4íve.
u2bl
u2b1o2
u3bœ
u2b1r
ub3s2
ub5ste
u3b2ul
u3búl
2uc
uco2i
uco5n4i5
ucon4í
ucó2i
u3cr
u2c3ue
2ud2
u3dam.
u3damq
u3damv
u2d3ap
u3dámn
u3dámq
u3dámv
u3dæ
u3de.
u3dene
u3deq
ude2s3
ude6ste
u3deu
u3dev
u3déne
u3déq
u3déu
u3dév
u3di
udig3
u3dí
udí5tur
u3do
udo3p
ud4or
u3dós
u3dú
u2e
ue2a
ue3b
ue3d2
ue2e
2uef
4uel.
2ueln
2uelq
2uelu
2uelú
2uelv
ue2ma
ue2má
ue4mui
ue4m3uí
ue4n3ea
ue4n3eá
ue4n3eo
ue4n3eó
ue4n3ii
ue4n3ií
ue4n3íi
2uenn
ue2o
ue3r4a
ue3r2æ3
ue3r4e
ue5rem
uere5me
uere5mé
uer6e5mi
uere5mí
ue3ri
ue3r4o
3uert
ue3ru
ues3c
ue4s3p
ues5pe
ue2sq
ue4s3t
ues5te
ue2su
uete5re
uete5ri
ueteri5u
ue2un
ue2us
2uev
ue3x2
u2é
1uéc
2uéf
1uéh
ué1i
1uél
ué4n3eo
3uéni
ué4n3ii
2uénn
2uéra
2uéro
3uérs
3uért
ués3
3uésp
2uév
1uéx
2ug
u3g2a
u3g2æ3
u3g2l
u2g3n
u3hœ
u3hy
u3hý
ui2a
u2ic
ui4c5énn
1uif
uile3
uilé3i
u2in
ui3oc
ui3o2p
ui3óp
ui3p2t
ui3r4i
ui3rí
3uisc
ui3s2i
uiu2
ui3ul
ui3uu
2uiv
1uíc
1uíf
1uíg
uí1m
3uínc
uí3o2p
uí3p2t
3uísa
3uísæ
3uíse
3uísi
3uíso
3uísu.
3uísum
3uísus
uí3tur
3uíua
3uíuen
3uíueq
3uíues
3uíuet
3uíueu
3uíuo
3uíuu
1uíx
u3lae
2u3læ
u3lee
u3lei
u3leí
u3len
u3leo
u3leó
u3leú
3ulix
3u2líx
3ulm
ul3ua
ul3uá
ul3uæ
u4l3ue.
ul3uó
2um.
2uma
u3ma.
uma2g
u3m2an
u3maq
uma4tr
u3mau
u3mav
2umá
umá2g
u3mán
u3máq
u3már
u3máu
u3máv
u3mæ
um3b2
umb4e
umb4i
um5bit
umbi5ti
umb6itu
umbi5tur
umbi5tú
umbí5te
2ume
u3me.
ume3d
ume5de
ume2g
ume2q
u3mev
umé2g
umi2b
umi2c
uminí4c
umi2r
umi2u
umi2v
umí2b
umíni4c
umí2r
2umn
2umo
u3mo.
u3mon
u3moq
u3mor
u3mou
u3mov
2umó
u3món
u3móq
u3mór
u3móu
u3móv
2umq
2umu
u4mue
um3uí
u3mus
u3mús
2umv
un3aní
un3áni
un3d2
3undáb
5undánd
5undáns
5undára
5undáro
5undárun
5undáss
5undást
5undáuer
5undáui
5undáver
5undávi
un2e
un4e3b
une3d
une6ste
un2é
uné3b
u3nos
u3nós
un3s
uns2i
un4sn
un4sq
un4sue
un4sv
2unt
unte5io
unte5ió
unte5iu
unte6iue
unté3i
un2u
1u2o
uob2
uo2du
uo3iæ
uo3io
uo3ió
uo2i3q
uo4iue
uo2iv
uo4lue
uol5uere
uo4lui
uol5uit
uo4luí
uom3p2
uo3ni
uo4n3ia
uo3p2
uos3t
uos5te
uo3u
uo1ú
uó2du
uó3iæ
uó3io
1uól
uóm3p2
uó4n3ia
uó3p2
2up
upe2
upe5raeq
upe5ran
upe5rara
upe5rará
upe5rare
upe5raré
upe5raro
upe5raró
uper5as6c
upe5ráe
upe5rár
upe5ræq
uper5eá
upe5remn
uper5eo
uper5eó
uper5e6ra
uper5e6rá
uper5e6rim
uper5e6rit
uper5e6rít
upere6ro
uper5e6ró
upere6ru
uper5erun
uper5e6rú
uper5esc
upe5rémn
uper5é6rim
uper5é6rit
uper5ésc
uperi4
upe4r5ie
uper5ié
uper5ir
uper5ito
uper5itó
uper5itú
uper5ími
uper5í4r
uper5íte
uper5íto
upe5rorn
upe5ros
upe5rórn
upe5rós
uper5uí
upe5rus
u3pé
upé4r5ea
upé4r5eo
upé4r5e4r
upé4ri.
upé4r5ie
upo4s3
upr6emi
2uq
u3qu
u1r
2ur.
ur2a
u3ra.
urad2
u3rae
u3rane
u3raq
u3rarú
u3rau
u3rav
u3ráe
u3ráne
u3ráq
u3ráu
u3ráv
2u3ræ
ur2e
ure3d
ure2i
ure5iae
ure5iam
ure5iar
ure5ias
ure5iáe
ure5iám
ure5iáq
ure5iár
ure5iás
ure5iáu
ure5iáv
ure3iæ
ure5ium
ure3iú
ures3t
ur2é
u3réf
ur2i
u3ria
u3riá
u3riæ
u3rii
u3r4ií
ur4in
2u3rio
2u3rió
u3ría
2urío
urí5tur
2urn
2ur2o
urobo3
4u3rod
ur4or
uro2s
u3rós
2urq
ur5rim
ur3ua
ur3uá
ur3uém
ur3uén
ur3ués
ur3uét
ur2ui
u3rum
ur3uó
u3rus
u3rúm
u3rús
2us.
usá4tr
2us3c
use2i
2usé
us2i
2usm
2usn
u1sp
us5per
us4pit
us4pír
us4pít
2us3q
us3t
us5ter
u3s4tom
u3s4tóm
us5tro
us4ty
us4tý
us2ua
4usue
u2sui
u2suí
2usv
1ut.
u4tar.
u4tarn
u4tarq
u4tarv
u4tárn
u4tárq
u4tárv
u2teb
4ute3r4a
4uterá
4uteræ
ute5re
4ute5ri
uteri5ue
uteri5v
4ute3ro
4uteró
4uterum
ute5rus
4uterú
u2téb
4utéra
2uth
2u3tia
2u3tiá
2utiæ
2u3tii
2u3tií
u2til
2u3tio
u2tíl
2utl
3utra
u2trá
3u2træ
ut4ri
3u2tru
u2trú
ut2u
ut3ut
u1u
2u3ue
1u2ul
uul3ui
uul3uí
u2um1
u2un
u2ur
u2us
u2uu
u2uv
1uúl
uúl3u
uú1r
2u3ve
ux2
uxi3n4
u2xo3
uxu3
u2x3ue
uy2s
úbe4ram
úb4eris
úbe4rit
úb4ii.
ú3b4iis
ú3b2iu
úbi3ui
úbi3v
úb3s2
úb5ste
ú3b2u
2úc
ú2c3ue
úd2i
úe1
úe2a
úe2o
ú3g2a
ú3gæ
ú2g3n
ú3iæ
ú1ii
ú2in
ú2la.
ú2lat
ú2let
ú2lu
úl3ua
úl3uæ
úl3ue
úl3uis
ú3lum
úm1
ú1ma
úma2g
ú3m2an
ú3maq
úma2r
ú3mau
ú3mav
úm3b2
úmb4e
úmb4i
úm5bi5t
úmb6itu
úm2e
úmi2c
úm2im
úm2in
úm2iu
2úmn
ú1mo
2úmq
2úmu
ú3mun
2úmv
5úndans
2úni
ún3si
2únt
ún2u
úpe3r
2úq
ú1ra
2ú1ræ
úr2e
ú1ri
ú3ria
ú3riæ
ú3rii
2úrn
ú1ro
2úrq
úr3ua
ú3r2ui
úru3m
ú2run
ú3rus
ús3c
ús2i
2úsn
ús3q
ús3t
4úsue
ú2sui
2úsv
ú2tar
úte3r
2ú3tia
2útiæ
2ú3tii
ú2til
ú1u
2úue
ú2um
ú2un
ú2us
2úve
2úx
úx2a
úx2o
ú2xue
1v
va3d2
vad4o
va3g
val4u
vas3p
vas5te
v2á
v3áed
vás3p
2væ2d
vb2
vbi2
ve1
ve2a
ve2ia
ve2iá
ve4iene
ve4ieq
ve4ieu
ve4iev
ve2ii
ve2ií
ve4io.
ve4ioq
ve4ior
ve6ioue.
ve6iove.
ve4ión
ve4ióq
ve4iór
ve6ióue.
ve6ióve.
ve2iu
ve2iú
ve2í
ve2lu
ve4n3ea
ve4n3eá
ve4n3eo
ve4n3eó
ve4n3ii
ve4n3ií
ve4n3íi
2venn
ve2o
ve3r4a
ver2æ3
ve3ri
ve2sc
ve4s3p
ves5pe
ve2sq
ve4s3t
ves5te
vete5re
vete5ri
veteri5v
ve2u
vex2
vé2lu
vé4n3eo
vé4n3ii
2vénn
vés3
v2i
vi2a
vi4c5énn
vi3d
vipe3
vi3r4i
3viu
3viú
víd2
ví3tu
2vj
vob2
vo3lu
vos3t
vos5te
vó3l2u
vr2a
vri2
1x
x1a
xae2
x2aeq
xaes3
x2aeu
x2aev
x2ag
2xal
xam4b3i4
xam4bí4
x2an
x2aq
x2are
x2at
xáes3
x2áeu
x2áev
x2ág
2xál
xám4b3i
x2át
x1æ2
x2æ3q
xæs3
x2æ3u
x2æ3v
2xc2
xcí3
xe1
xe2a
x2eb
x2ed
xe2e
xe4ger
xe4gér
xe2gi
xe2gí
xe2i
xe2í
x2emi
x3enn
xe2o
xe4qui
x2era
x2erá
x2ere
x2eri
x2ero
x2eró
x2eru
x2erú
x2e2s
xe2u
3xeue
xe2ú
x2é
x3é2g
x3émp
x3énn
xé4qui
x3érc
2xh
xi2b
2xie
3x2ies
2x1i2g
xi2i
x2im
xi2n
xin3a
xi3ni
xi3ní
xi3nú
x2iq
2xi2r
x2iss
xi2tæ
x2itn
x2itq
xi2tu
x2itv
xi4uer
xi4uér
2xi2ui
xi2uí
x2i3uu
xi4ver
xi4vér
2xi2vi
xi2ví
2xí2b
2xí2g
2xí2mu
x2ín
x2íq
2xí2r
x2ís
xí2ta
xí4te.
2xí2ti
x2ítn
2xí2to
x2ítq
x2ítv
xí4uer
xí4uim
xí4uit
xí4ver
xí4vim
xí4vit
2xj
x2l2
2x1n
x3ne
x1o2
3xo.
x2o3d
3xon
3xoq
xorí3t
xo4rn
xo4rq
xo3ru
xo4rv
3xos
xo4sn
xo4sq
xo4su
xo4sv
x2o3t
3xo3u
3xo3v
xó4ner
xó4rat
xó4rer
xó4ret
xó4ror
xó2s
x2ót
2xp
xpe2r
2xq
x3qu
2x1s2
xs4pe
xsu4lu
xsupe3
2xt
x3ta
x3tá
x3tæ
x3te
xte3r4a
xte5re
xte5ri
xteri5ue
xteri5v
xte3ro
xte5rus
x3ti1
x3tí
x3to
x3tó
x3tr
xtr6emi
x3tu
x3tú
x1u2
3xu.
2x3ue.
x3uev
xu4le
3x2um
xum2e
xu4mn
xu4mq
xu4mv
x2une
xu3ro
3xus
xu4sn
xu4sq
x2u4su
xu4sv
x2uum
x2uúm
xú2b
xú2l
x2úm
x2úne
xú1r
x2úsq
x2úsu
xú2t
xú2ui
xú2vi
2xv
x3ve
x2x2
yad2
ya2nu
yá2nu
yb2
ybe2
yd2
yda3m
yde2s
ye2
yes3
yé2
yés3
y2g3n
ygo3
y2i
yi2i
yin2
yio2s
yis3
yl3ui
yl3uí
y1m
ym2e
yme3d
yme5de
y1n
yne2
yn2i
yo3ne
yo3ni
yó1
yperi5n
y1r
yr2a
yr2á
yr4or
yro2s
ys2i
yste3
y1su
yte1
yte5ri
yteri5ue
yteri5v
y2xu
ýa1
ýad2
ýda3
ý2g3n
ý2i
ý2l1u
ý1m
ým2e
ý1r
ýs2i
ýste3
ýte1
ý2th
ý2xu
1z
zá1m
ze3b
z2i
zma3
zo1
zo2s
